District of Columbia statutes.
1-605.03

Transition procedures.

(a)

The property and facilities of the Board of Labor Relations, established pursuant to Commissioner’s Order 70-229, shall be transferred to the Public Employee Relations Board as provided in subchapter XXXVI of this chapter.

(b)

The personnel and positions assigned to the Board of Labor Relations shall be transferred to the Public Employee Relations Board as provided in subchapter XXXVI of this chapter: Provided, however, that incumbents of positions considered surplus to the needs of the Public Employee Relations Board may be separated in accordance with the provisions of subchapter XXIV of this chapter.

(c)

All cases pending before the Board of Labor Relations shall be transferred to the Public Employee Relations Board on the effective date of subchapters V and XVII of this chapter as prescribed by § 1-636.02(i). The Public Employee Relations Board, with respect to any such transferred case, shall take such action as could have been taken by the Board of Labor Relations pursuant to labor-management relations programs as they existed when the case was filed, including those programs referred to in § 1-632.07(a).

History

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 503, 25 DCR 5740
Aug. 7, 1980, D.C. Law 3-81, § 2(d), 27 DCR 2632

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-605.3.
1973 Ed., § 1-335.3.